Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.122

Out-of-state purchasing.

Residents of Washington may purchase rifles and shotguns in a state other than Washington: PROVIDED, That such residents conform to the applicable provisions of the federal Gun Control Act of 1968, Title IV, Pub. L. 90-351 as administered by the United States secretary of the treasury: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That such residents are eligible to purchase or possess such weapons in Washington and in the state in which such purchase is made: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That when any part of the transaction takes place in Washington , including, but not limited to, internet sales, such residents are subject to the procedures and background checks required by this chapter.

[ 2015 c 1 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 594, approved November 4, 2014); 1970 ex.s. c 74 s 1. Formerly RCW 19.70.010.]

NOTES:

Finding—2015 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 594): See note following RCW 9.41.010.